Utah statutes.
58-50-3.   Board -- Membership -- Duties.

(1)  There is created the Private Probation Provider Licensing Board. The board shall consist of five members as follows:

(a)  one member representing the administrative office of the courts;

(b)  one member representing the Department of Corrections;

(c)  two members licensed as private probation providers; and

(d)  one member from the general public.

(2)  The board shall be appointed by the governor and serve in accordance with Section 58-1-201.

(3)  The duties and responsibilities of the board shall be in accordance with Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203.



Amended by Chapter 297, 1993 General Session

